New Jersey, session 221, S4588.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of section 41 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:16I-50) or any other law or regulation to the contrary, revenues collected from the Social Equity Excise Fee pursuant to subsection d. of section 41 of P.L.2021, c.16 (C.24:6I-50) shall be appropriated as follows: $3,000,000 each fiscal year to the Department of State to support funding for Freedom Schools in New Jersey, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.